New York, session 2025-2026, S904.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "consumer utility protections during investigations act" or the 3 "CUPDI act". 4 § 2. Section 2 of the public service law is amended by adding a new 5 subdivision 30 to read as follows: 6 30. "Final determination" or "finally determined" means a judicial 7 decision: (i) by the highest court of competent jurisdiction; or (ii) by 8 a court of competent jurisdiction from which no appeal has been taken 9 and the time within which to appeal has expired. 10 § 3. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 54 to 11 read as follows: 12 § 54. Investigations relating to residential gas, electric and steam 13 utility service. 1. For the purposes of this section, the term "investi- 14 gation" shall mean a formal proceeding conducted by the commission to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00509-05-5 S. 904--B 2 1 examine the billing, rates, or charges of a utility corporation or any 2 proceeding during which the commission deems it appropriate to pause the 3 charges described in subdivision two of this section. The term "inves- 4 tigation" shall include such proceedings conducted pursuant to section 5 seventy-one of this chapter. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule 6 or regulation to the contrary, the term "investigation" shall not 7 include commission inquiries triggered by an individual customer 8 complaint filed pursuant to section forty-three of this article. The 9 term "investigation" shall not include a proceeding relating to a "major 10 change" as defined in paragraph (c) of subdivision twelve of section 11 sixty-six of this chapter. 12 2. (a) A utility corporation shall not impose late fees, interest or 13 penalties during an investigation if such utility corporation is the 14 subject of a pending investigation, provided however, that such late 15 fees, interest and penalties may be imposed retroactively if such inves- 16 tigation is issued a final order in favor of such utility corporation. 17 Such late payment charges shall be in compliance with the guidelines set 18 forth in section forty-two of this article. 19 (b) Upon the final determination or by the issuance of a final order, 20 of any investigation covered by this section, the commission shall 21 either (i) determine any allowable penalties the utility corporation may 22 impose upon its customers, or (ii) waive, or partially waive, any inter- 23 est or fees charged by the utility corporation to the consumer on such 24 consumer's billing statements during a period such utility corporation 25 determines to be related to such investigation. 26 3. Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, order, or tariff to the 27 contrary, utility service shall not be terminated to residential 28 accounts for non-payment of an overdue charge from the commencement of 29 any commission investigation until one hundred twenty days after the 30 findings of such investigation have been published and a determination 31 has been issued by the commission. Nothing in this section shall prohib- 32 it a utility corporation from disconnecting service necessary to protect 33 the health and safety of customers and the public. 34 4. (a) Within ten days of the commencement of an investigation, the 35 utility corporation shall notify residential customers of such investi- 36 gation. Forms of notification of an investigation from a utility corpo- 37 ration to a residential customer shall include, but not be limited to, 38 letters, notices on utility bills, phone calls, and notices posted on 39 the utility corporation's website. 40 (b) Within three days of the commencement of an investigation, the 41 department shall post a notice to the general public of such investi- 42 gation on its website. 43 § 4. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 77-a to 44 read as follows: 45 § 77-a. Investigations relating to commercial gas and electric utility 46 service. 1. For the purposes of this section, the term "investigation" 47 shall mean a formal proceeding conducted by the commission to examine 48 the billing, rates, or charges of a utility corporation or any proceed- 49 ing during which the commission deems it appropriate to pause the charg- 50 es described in subdivision two of this section. The term "investi- 51 gation" shall include such proceedings conducted pursuant to section 52 seventy-one of this article. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regu- 53 lation to the contrary, the term "investigation" shall not include 54 commission inquiries triggered by an individual customer complaint filed 55 pursuant to section forty-three of this chapter. The term "investi- 56 gation" shall not include a proceeding relating to a "major change" as S. 904--B 3 1 defined in paragraph (c) of subdivision twelve of section sixty-six of 2 this article. 3 2. (a) A utility corporation shall not impose late fees, interest or 4 penalties during an investigation if such utility corporation is the 5 subject of a pending investigation, provided however, that such late 6 fees, interest and penalties may be imposed retroactively if such inves- 7 tigation is issued a final order in favor of such utility corporation. 8 Such late payment charges shall be in compliance with the guidelines set 9 forth in section sixty-five of this article. 10 (b) Upon the final determination or by the issuance of a final order, 11 of any investigation covered by this section, the commission shall 12 either (i) determine any allowable penalties the utility corporation may 13 impose upon its customers, or (ii) waive, or partially waive, any inter- 14 est or fees charged by such utility corporation to the consumer on such 15 consumer's billing statements during a period such utility corporation 16 determines to be related to such investigation. 17 3. Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, order, or tariff to the 18 contrary, utility service shall not be terminated to residential 19 accounts for non-payment of an overdue charge from the commencement of 20 any commission investigation until one hundred twenty days after the 21 findings of such investigation have been published and a determination 22 has been issued by the commission. Nothing in this section shall prohib- 23 it a utility corporation from disconnecting service necessary to protect 24 the health and safety of customers and the public. 25 4. (a) Within ten days of the commencement of an investigation, the 26 utility corporation shall notify residential customers of such investi- 27 gation. Forms of notification of an investigation from a utility corpo- 28 ration to a residential customer shall include, but not be limited to, 29 letters, notices on utility bills, phone calls, and notices posted on 30 the utility corporation's website. 31 (b) Within three days of the commencement of an investigation, the 32 department shall post a notice to the general public of such investi- 33 gation on its website. 34 § 5. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 85-a to 35 read as follows: 36 § 85-a. Investigations relating to commercial steam utility service. 37 1. For the purposes of this section, the term "investigation" shall 38 mean a formal proceeding conducted by the commission to examine the 39 billing, rates, or charges, of a utility corporation or any proceeding 40 during which the commission deems it appropriate to pause the charges 41 described in subdivision two of this section. The term "investigation" 42 shall include such proceedings conducted pursuant to section seventy-one 43 of this chapter. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the 44 contrary, the term "investigation" shall not include commission 45 inquiries triggered by an individual customer complaint filed pursuant 46 to section forty-three of this chapter. The term "investigation" shall 47 not include a proceeding relating to a "major change" as defined in 48 paragraph (c) of subdivision twelve of section sixty-six of this chap- 49 ter. 50 2. (a) A utility corporation shall not impose late fees, interest, or 51 penalties during an investigation if such utility corporation is the 52 subject of a pending investigation, provided however, that such late 53 fees, interest and penalties may be imposed retroactively if such inves- 54 tigation is issued a final order in favor of such utility corporation. 55 Such late payment charges shall be in compliance with section seventy- 56 nine of this article. S. 904--B 4 1 (b) Upon the final determination or by the issuance of a final order, 2 of any investigation covered by this section, the commission shall 3 either (i) determine any allowable penalties the utility corporation may 4 impose upon its customers, or (ii) waive, or partially waive, any inter- 5 est or fees charged by the utility corporation to the consumer on such 6 consumer's billing statements during a period such utility corporation 7 determines to be related to such investigation. 8 3. Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, order, or tariff to the 9 contrary, utility service shall not be terminated to residential 10 accounts for non-payment of an overdue charge from the commencement of 11 any commission investigation until one hundred twenty days after the 12 findings of such investigation have been published and a determination 13 has been issued by the commission. Nothing in this section shall prohib- 14 it a utility corporation from disconnecting service necessary to protect 15 the health and safety of customers and the public. 16 4. (a) Within ten days of the commencement of an investigation, the 17 utility corporation shall notify residential customers of such investi- 18 gation. Forms of notification of an investigation from a utility corpo- 19 ration to a residential customer shall include, but not be limited to, 20 letters, notices on utility bills, phone calls, and notices posted on 21 the utility corporation's website. 22 (b) Within three days of the commencement of an investigation, the 23 department shall post a notice to the general public of such investi- 24 gation on its website. 25 § 6. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 16-a to 26 read as follows: 27 § 16-a. Reports on investigatory proceedings relating to gas, elec- 28 tric, and steam service. The commission shall submit to the governor, 29 the speaker of the assembly, the temporary president of the senate, the 30 chair of the assembly corporations, commissions, and authorities commit- 31 tee, and the chair of the senate energy and telecommunications committee 32 an annual report detailing the list of investigations that were deemed 33 applicable under sections fifty-four, seventy-seven-a, and eighty-five-a 34 of this chapter. Such report shall include an explanation of the 35 instances where the commission has deemed the use of such provisions 36 appropriate. Additionally, the report shall include all appropriate 37 case numbers, or docket numbers where applicable, utilized in the 38 commission's records keeping systems and any other information that the 39 commission deems necessary. 40 For the purposes of this section, the term "investigation" shall have 41 the same meaning as defined in sections fifty-four, seventy-seven-a, and 42 eighty-five-a of this chapter. 43 § 7. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 44 have become a law.